test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-celties_gt-norm.yaml
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: celtiess
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: celtiesa
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: celtiesam
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: celtiesu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: celtiesā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: celtiesi
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: celtiesu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: celtiesiem
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: celtiesus
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: celtiesos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: celtiesais
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: celtiesā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: celtiesajam
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: celtieso
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: celtiesajā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: celtiesais
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: celtiesie
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: celtieso
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: celtiesajiem
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: celtiesos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: celtiesajos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: celtiesie
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: celtiesa
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: celtiesas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: celtiesai
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: celtiesu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: celtiesā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: celtiesas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: celtiesu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: celtiesām
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: celtiesas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: celtiesās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: celtiesā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: celtiesās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: celtiesajai
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: celtieso
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: celtiesajā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: celtiesā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: celtiesās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: celtieso
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: celtiesajām
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: celtiesās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: celtiesajās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: celtiesās
#"Declension":"4"
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: celšanās
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: celšanās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: celšanai
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: celšanos
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: celšanā
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: celšana
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: celšanās
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: celšanos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: celšanām
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: celšanās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: celšanās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: celšanas
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: cēldamiess
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: cēldamās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: cēldami
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: cēldamas

#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos: rokoši


#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: cēliens
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: cēliena
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: cēlienam
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: cēlienu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: cēlienā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: [cēliens, cēlien]
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: cēlieni
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: cēlienu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: cēlieniem
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: cēlienus
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: cēlienos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: cēlieni

     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2: ceļoties
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2: ceļamies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Cond: celtos
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Deb+Quo: jāceļoties
